Illinois, session 104th, SB2198.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1118 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1118 new)8    Sec. 605-1118. Small business financing program. Subject 9to appropriation, the Department shall create a small business 10financing program to provide low-interest financing to small 11businesses that secure State contracts to assist with the 12fulfilment of those contracts. 13    Section 10. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 14changing Section 45-45 and by adding Section 50-95 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 500/45-45)16    Sec. 45-45. Small businesses. 17    (a) Set-asides. Each chief procurement officer has 18authority to designate as small business set-asides a fair 19proportion of construction, supply, and service contracts for 20award to small businesses in Illinois. Advertisements for bids 21or offers for those contracts shall specify designation as   SB2198- 2 -LRB104 10102 HLH 20174 b1small business set-asides and the advertisements shall be 2uniformly distributed to the small business community in this 3State. In awarding the contracts, only bids or offers from 4qualified small businesses shall be considered.5    (b) Small business. "Small business" means a business that 6is independently owned and operated and that is not dominant 7in its field of operation. The chief procurement officer shall 8establish a detailed definition by rule, using in addition to 9the foregoing criteria other criteria, including the number of 10employees and the dollar volume of business. When computing 11the size status of a potential contractor, annual sales and 12receipts of the potential contractor and all of its affiliates 13shall be included. The maximum number of employees and the 14maximum dollar volume that a small business may have under the 15rules promulgated by the chief procurement officer may vary 16from industry to industry to the extent necessary to reflect 17differing characteristics of those industries, subject to the 18following limitations:19        (1) No wholesale business is a small business if its 20    annual sales for its most recently completed fiscal year 21    exceed $13,000,000.22        (2) No retail business or business selling services is 23    a small business if its annual sales and receipts exceed 24    $8,000,000.25        (3) No manufacturing business is a small business if 26    it employs more than 250 persons.  SB2198- 3 -LRB104 10102 HLH 20174 b1        (4) No construction business is a small business if 2    its annual sales and receipts exceed $14,000,000.3    (c) Fair proportion. For the purpose of subsection (a), 4for State agencies of the executive branch, a fair proportion 5of construction contracts shall be no less than 25% nor more 6than 40% of the annual total contracts for construction.7    (d) Withdrawal of designation. A small business set-aside 8designation may be withdrawn by the purchasing agency when 9deemed in the best interests of the State. Upon withdrawal, 10all bids or offers shall be rejected, and the bidders or 11offerors shall be notified of the reason for rejection. The 12contract shall then be awarded in accordance with this Code 13without the designation of small business set-aside. Each 14chief procurement officer shall make the annual report 15available on his or her official website. Each chief 16procurement officer shall also issue a press release in 17conjunction with the small business annual report that 18includes an executive summary of the annual report and a link 19to the annual report on the chief procurement officer's 20website.21    (e) Small business specialist. Each chief procurement 22officer shall designate one or more individuals to serve as 23its small business specialist. The small business specialists 24shall collectively work together to accomplish the following 25duties:26        (1) Compiling and maintaining a comprehensive list of   SB2198- 4 -LRB104 10102 HLH 20174 b1    potential small contractors. In this duty, he or she shall 2    cooperate with the Federal Small Business Administration 3    in locating potential sources for various products and 4    services.5        (2) Assisting small businesses in complying with the 6    procedures for bidding on State contracts.7        (3) Examining requests from State agencies for the 8    purchase of property or services to help determine which 9    invitations to bid are to be designated small business 10    set-asides.11        (4) Making recommendations to the chief procurement 12    officer for the simplification of specifications and terms 13    in order to increase the opportunities for small business 14    participation.15        (5) Assisting in investigations by purchasing agencies 16    to determine the responsibility of bidders or offerors on 17    small business set-asides.18    (f) Small business annual report. Each small business 19specialist designated under subsection (e) shall annually 20before November 1 report in writing to the General Assembly 21concerning the awarding of contracts to small businesses. The 22report shall include the total value of awards made in the 23preceding fiscal year under the designation of small business 24set-aside. The report shall also include the total value of 25awards made to businesses owned by minorities, women, and 26persons with disabilities, as defined in the Business   SB2198- 5 -LRB104 10102 HLH 20174 b1Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 2Disabilities Act, in the preceding fiscal year under the 3designation of small business set-aside.4    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 5shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 6by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act.7(Source: P.A. 103-570, eff. 1-1-24.) 8    (30 ILCS 500/50-95 new)9    Sec. 50-95. Small business scorecard. The Department of 10Central Management Services shall, in consultation with State 11agencies, develop a scorecard for the assessment of bids from 12businesses that have annual gross sales of less than 13$15,000,000 as evidenced by the federal income tax return of 14the business. The scorecard shall include the relevant 15experience of the business, the location of the business, the 16length of time the business has been operating in this State, 17staff credentials, innovation, and other socioeconomic 18factors.